Hawaii statutes.
[§431:22-105] Technical advisory committee.
The commissioner shall appoint an advisory committee of persons having
expertise and familiarity relevant to the mitigation grant program and
feasibility study report. [L 2002, c 179, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next